Utah statutes.
7-24-301.   Enforcement by department -- Rulemaking.

(1)  Subject to the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the department may:

(a)  receive and act on complaints;

(b)  take action designed to obtain voluntary compliance with this chapter; or

(c)  commence administrative or judicial proceedings on its own initiative to enforce compliance with this chapter.

(2)  The department may:

(a)  counsel persons and groups on their rights and duties under this chapter;

(b)  make rules to:

(i)  restrict or prohibit lending or servicing practices that are misleading, unfair, or abusive;

(ii)  promote or assure fair and full disclosure of the terms and conditions of agreements and communications between title lenders and customers; or

(iii)  promote or assure uniform application of or to resolve ambiguities in applicable state or federal laws or federal regulations; and

(c)  employ hearing examiners, clerks, and other employees and agents as necessary to perform the department's duties under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

